Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-412
Hunting or fur-harvesting permit; exception for dog trials.

No hunting permit or fur-harvesting permit shall be required of any nonresident entering this state solely to participate in scheduled dog trials for which an entry fee is charged. For purposes of this section, scheduled dog trials means events in which hunting dogs and their owners or handlers compete and are judged under controlled conditions in various feats of skill and performance in the hunting or retrieving of birds and animals when such events are conducted under the written authorization of the commission.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 122.